hr-HR: Mehanizam za podešivača ukulele: Frikcijski; Sa zupčanikom; Planetarni; Ostalo
ro-RO: Mecanismul cheilor de acordare ale ukulelei: Frecare; Cu angrenaj; Planetar; Altele
zh-TW: 烏克麗麗調音器機制: 摩擦式; 齒輪式; 行星齒輪式; 其他
pl: Mechanizm stroików ukulele: Cierne; Zębate; Planetarne; Inne
cs: Ladicí mechanismus ukulele: Třecí; Převodové; Planetární; Ostatní
sv: Ukulele-stämningsmekanism: Friktion; Kuggväxlad; Planetväxel; Övrigt
tr: Ukulele akort mekanizması: Sürtünmeli; Dişlili; Planet; Diğer
de: Mechanik der Ukulelenstimmwirbel: Friktion; Übersetzt; Planetar; Andere
pt-BR: Ukulele mecanismo das tarraxas: Fricção; Com engrenagem; Planetário; Outro
ru: Механизм колков укулеле: Фрикционный; С зубчатой передачей; Планетарный; Другое
sl-SI: Mehanizem uglaševanja za ukulele: Torni; Zobniški; Planetarni; Drugo
hu: Ukulele hangolókulcs-mechanizmusa: Súrlódó; Áttételes; Bolygóműves; Egyéb
fi: Ukulelen viritinmekanismi: Kitka; Hammasratas; Planeetta; Muu
bg-BG: Механизъм на ключовете за настройване на укулелето: Фрикционен; Зъбчат; Планетарен; Друг
fr: Mécanisme d’accordage de l’ukulélé: Friction; Engrenages; Planétaire; Autre
nl: Ukulele stemmechanisme: Frictie; Tandwiel; Planetair; Anders
sk-SK: Ladiaci mechanizmus ukulele: Trecí; Prevodový; Planetárny; Iné
vi: Cơ chế chỉnh dây đàn ukulele: Ma sát; Bánh răng; Bánh răng hành tinh; Khác
pt-PT: Mecanismo de afinação do ukulele: Fricção; Engrenagem; Planetário; Outro
ko: 우쿨렐레 튜너 메커니즘: 마찰식; 기어식; 플래니터리; 기타
da: Stemmemekanisme for ukulele: Friktion; Med gear; Planetgear; Andet
lt-LT: Ukulelės derintuvo mechanizmas: Frikcinis; Su krumpliaračiais; Planetarinis; Kita
ja: ウクレレのチューナーメカニズム: フリクション; ギア; プラネタリー; その他
en: Ukulele tuner mechanism: Friction; Geared; Planetary; Other
it: Meccanismo di accordatura dell'ukulele: A frizione; A ingranaggi; Planetario; Altro
el: Μηχανισμός κουρδιστηριού ουκουλέλε: Τριβής; Με γρανάζια; Πλανητικά; Άλλο
nb: Ukulele-stemmermekanisme: Friksjon; Mekanisk; Planetarisk; Annet
zh-CN: 尤克里里调音器结构: 摩擦式; 齿轮式; 行星齿轮式; 其他
es: Mecanismo de afinación del ukelele: Fricción; Engranaje; Planetario; Otro
th: กลไกปรับสายอูคูเลเล่: แบบฝืด; แบบเฟือง; แบบแพลนเนทารี; อื่นๆ